Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-542
Inspections authorized.

The property, books, records, accounts, papers, and proceedings of every warehouse shall, at all times during business hours, be subject to inspection by the commission.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 18.